Utah statutes.
41-1a-508.   Prerequisites for titling.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided, prior to titling a vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor an owner must provide evidence of:

(a)  title or ownership under Section 41-1a-509;

(b)  payment of sales taxes in accordance with Section 41-1a-510;

(c)  payment of all applicable fees under Part 12, Fee and Tax Requirements;

(d)  the identification number inspection required under Section 41-1a-511;

(e)  the odometer statement required under Section 41-1a-902; and

(f)  evidence of property tax clearance for manufactured homes and mobile homes.

(2)  An application for registration or current registration is not a prerequisite for obtaining a title.

